Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-616
Reports; department to tabulate.

The department shall preserve permanently all births, deaths, marriages, and divorces received, and shall tabulate statistics therefrom.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 19, p. 785;

C.S.1922, § 8249;

Laws 1927, c. 166, § 12, p. 453;

C.S.1929, § 71-2420;

R.S.1943, § 71-616;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 527;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 416;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 95.